src/gobelo_grammar_toolkit/hfst/chitonga_hfst/chitonga.lexc
LEXICON ObjectMarkerOrRoot
  nga%+COND%@P.MOOD.SUBJ@:nga ObjectMarker ; ! conditional
  nga%+POT%@P.MOOD.SUBJ@:nga ObjectMarker ;  ! potential
  la%+PROG:la ObjectMarker ;                  ! progressive infix
  ci%+PROG:ci ObjectMarker ;                  ! progressive variant
  ObjectMarker ;                              ! zero modal

! ── SLOT 7: Object markers ────────────────────────────────────
! Grammar: concord_system.concords.object_concords
! @R.NC.X@ requires that the NC was set by SM in SLOT 3.

LEXICON ObjectMarker
! Personal OM
  ndi%+OM1SG:ndi VerbRoot ;     ! 1SG object
  ku%+OM2SG:ku VerbRoot ;       ! 2SG object
  tu%+OM1PL:tu VerbRoot ;       ! 1PL object
  mu%+OM2PL:mu VerbRoot ;       ! 2PL object
! NC OM — each requires matching NC set by SM
  mu%+OM1%@R.NC.1@:mu VerbRoot ;
  ba%+OM2%@R.NC.2@:ba VerbRoot ;
  u%+OM3%@R.NC.3@:u VerbRoot ;
  i%+OM4%@R.NC.4@:i VerbRoot ;
  li%+OM5%@R.NC.5@:li VerbRoot ;
  a%+OM6%@R.NC.6@:a VerbRoot ;
  ci%+OM7%@R.NC.7@:ci VerbRoot ;
  chi%+OM7%@R.NC.7@:chi VerbRoot ;
  zi%+OM8%@R.NC.8@:zi VerbRoot ;
  i%+OM9%@R.NC.9@:i VerbRoot ;
  zi%+OM10%@R.NC.10@:zi VerbRoot ;
  lu%+OM11%@R.NC.11@:lu VerbRoot ;
  ka%+OM12%@R.NC.12@:ka VerbRoot ;
  tu%+OM13%@R.NC.13@:tu VerbRoot ;
  bu%+OM14%@R.NC.14@:bu VerbRoot ;
  ku%+OM15%@R.NC.15@:ku VerbRoot ;
  a%+OM16%@R.NC.16@:a VerbRoot ;
  ku%+OM17%@R.NC.17@:ku VerbRoot ;
  mu%+OM18%@R.NC.18@:mu VerbRoot ;
  VerbRoot ;                     ! zero OM (most common)


! ── SLOT 8: Verb root ─────────────────────────────────────────
! Populated from verbs.yaml by chitonga_transform.py
! Entries generated by the build script — stub examples below.

LEXICON VerbRoot
! AUTO-GENERATED FROM verbs.yaml — do not edit by hand.
! Format: stem+V:stem DerivSuffix ;  ! gloss
  bon%+V:bon DerivSuffix ;    ! see
  la%+V:la DerivSuffix ;      ! eat
  ya%+V:ya DerivSuffix ;      ! go
  lil%+V:lil DerivSuffix ;    ! cry
  bona%+V:bona DerivSuffix ;  ! see (full form — stem=bon, FV=a; lexc resolves)
  bil%+V:bil DerivSuffix ;    ! give (from Abila)
  ban%+V:ban DerivSuffix ;    ! share (from Abana)
! ... (2000+ entries loaded from verbs.yaml at build time)


! ── SLOT 9: Derivational extensions ──────────────────────────
! Grammar: derivational_extensions, zones Z1-Z4
! canonical_order: ROOT + [Z1] + [Z2] + [Z3] + [Z4] + FV
! Zone ordering enforced via continuation classes:
!   Z1 entries continue to Z2OrFV
!   Z2 entries continue to Z3OrFV
!   Z3 entries continue to FinalVowel  (PASS is always last)
!   Z4 entries continue to Z3OrFV

LEXICON DerivSuffix
! ── Zone Z1: Valency-increasing ──
  il%+APPL:il Z2OrFV ;          ! applicative (high-vowel stem)
  el%+APPL:el Z2OrFV ;          ! applicative (mid-vowel stem) — VH.1
  en%+APPL:en Z2OrFV ;          ! applicative dialectal variant
  is%+CAUS:is Z2OrFV ;          ! causative (after consonant)
  isy%+CAUS:isy Z2OrFV ;        ! causative dialectal variant
  ish%+CAUS:ish Z2OrFV ;        ! causative after consonant
  esh%+CAUS:esh Z2OrFV ;        ! causative mid-vowel variant
  y%+CAUS:y Z2OrFV ;            ! causative after vowel-final stem
  ol%+TRANS:ol Z2OrFV ;         ! transitiviser
  ok%+TRANS:ok Z2OrFV ;         ! transitiviser intransitive variant
  at%+CONT:at Z2OrFV ;          ! contactive
! ── Zone Z4: Aspectual/lexical (before Z2) ──
  isy%+INTENS:isy Z2OrFV ;      ! intensive (NB: same surface as CAUS variant — context disambiguates)
  ishi%+INTENS:ishi Z2OrFV ;
  esy%+INTENS:esy Z2OrFV ;
  ilil%+PERF_EXT:ilil Z2OrFV ;  ! perfective extension
  elel%+PERF_EXT:elel Z2OrFV ;
  ul%+REV:ul Z2OrFV ;           ! reversive transitive
  ol%+REV:ol Z2OrFV ;           ! reversive mid-vowel
  uk%+REV:uk Z2OrFV ;           ! reversive intransitive
  ulul%+REPET:ulul Z2OrFV ;     ! repetitive
  olol%+REPET:olol Z2OrFV ;
  aul%+FREQ:aul Z2OrFV ;        ! frequentative
  auk%+FREQ:auk Z2OrFV ;
  am%+POS:am Z2OrFV ;           ! positional
! Zero extension — go direct to FV
  FinalVowel ;

LEXICON Z2OrFV
! ── Zone Z2: Valency-adjusting ──
  an%+RECIP%@R.NUM.PL@:an Z3OrFV ; ! reciprocal (requires plural SM)
  ik%+STAT:ik Z3OrFV ;          ! stative high-vowel
  ek%+STAT:ek Z3OrFV ;          ! stative mid-vowel
  Z3OrFV ;                      ! skip Z2

LEXICON Z3OrFV
! ── Zone Z3: Voice ── (PASS is always the final extension)
  w%+PASS:w FinalVowel ;        ! passive after vowel
  iw%+PASS:iw FinalVowel ;      ! passive after consonant
  ew%+PASS:ew FinalVowel ;      ! passive mid-vowel
  igw%+PASS:igw FinalVowel ;    ! passive after certain consonants
  FinalVowel ;                  ! skip PASS


! ── SLOT 10: Final vowel ─────────────────────────────────────
! Grammar: final_vowels section
! NEG FV (-i) requires @R.NEG.ON@ — set only when SLOT1 has ta-.
! SUBJ FV (-e) requires @R.MOOD.SUBJ@ — set by nga- in SLOT6.

LEXICON FinalVowel
  a%+FV_IND:a PostFinal ;                          ! indicative (default)
  e%+FV_SUBJ%@R.MOOD.SUBJ@:e PostFinal ;          ! subjunctive — requires nga-
  i%+FV_NEG%@R.NEG.ON@:i PostFinal ;              ! negative — requires ta-
  ide%+FV_PERF:ide PostFinal ;                     ! perfective / perfect
  eni%+FV_IMP_PL:eni PostFinal ;                   ! imperative plural

! ── SLOT 11: Post-final clitics ───────────────────────────────
! Grammar: post_final section

LEXICON PostFinal
  yo%+REL:yo # ;        ! relativiser -yo
  o%+REL:o # ;          ! relativiser -o
  na%+Q:na # ;          ! question marker
  nzi%+Q:nzi # ;        ! question marker variant
  ko%+EMP:ko # ;        ! emphatic
  pe%+NEG_POST:pe # ;   ! negation reinforcement
  mo%+LOC_CLITIC:mo # ; ! locative clitic (in/at)
  # ;                    ! no post-final clitic (end of word)


! ==============================================================
! NOUN PATH — all 18 noun classes
! ==============================================================

LEXICON NounPrefix
! ── NC1 Human singular ──
  mu%+NC1%+SG:mu NounRootNC1 ;
  mw%+NC1%+SG:mw NounRootNC1 ;      ! before vowel (SND.1b)
! ── NC2 Human plural ──
  ba%+NC2%+PL:ba NounRootNC2 ;
  b%+NC2%+PL:b NounRootNC2 ;        ! before vowel
! ── NC1a/NC2a kinship / proper names (zero prefix) ──
  %+NC1a%+SG: NounRootNC1a ;        ! zero prefix
! ── NC3 Trees/plants singular ──
  mu%+NC3%+SG:mu NounRootNC3 ;
  mw%+NC3%+SG:mw NounRootNC3 ;
! ── NC4 Trees/plants plural ──
  mi%+NC4%+PL:mi NounRootNC4 ;
  my%+NC4%+PL:my NounRootNC4 ;
! ── NC5 Augmentative/singular ──
  li%+NC5%+SG:li NounRootNC5 ;
  %+NC5%+SG: NounRootNC5 ;          ! zero prefix (many NC5 nouns)
! ── NC6 Liquids/masses/plurals ──
  ma%+NC6%+PL:ma NounRootNC6 ;
  m%+NC6%+PL:m NounRootNC6 ;        ! before consonant
! ── NC7 Things/diminutives singular ──
  ci%+NC7%+SG:ci NounRootNC7 ;
  chi%+NC7%+SG:chi NounRootNC7 ;    ! variant form
  c%+NC7%+SG:c NounRootNC7 ;        ! before vowel
! ── NC8 Things/diminutives plural ──
  zi%+NC8%+PL:zi NounRootNC8 ;
  zy%+NC8%+PL:zy NounRootNC8 ;      ! before vowel (SND.1a)
! ── NC9 Animals/loanwords singular ──
  %+NC9%+SG: NounRootNC9 ;          ! zero (before fricatives/vowels, SND.3e)
  n%+NC9%+SG:n NounRootNC9 ;        ! before alveolars
  m%+NC9%+SG:m NounRootNC9 ;        ! before bilabials (SND.3a)
  ng%+NC9%+SG:ng NounRootNC9 ;      ! before velars (SND.3c)
  ny%+NC9%+SG:ny NounRootNC9 ;      ! before palatals (SND.3d)
! ── NC10 Animals/loanwords plural ──
  zi%+NC10%+PL:zi NounRootNC10 ;
  zy%+NC10%+PL:zy NounRootNC10 ;
  n%+NC10%+PL:n NounRootNC10 ;      ! nasal plural
! ── NC11 Long objects singular ──
  lu%+NC11%+SG:lu NounRootNC11 ;
  lw%+NC11%+SG:lw NounRootNC11 ;
! ── NC12 Diminutive singular ──
  ka%+NC12%+SG:ka NounRootNC12 ;
  k%+NC12%+SG:k NounRootNC12 ;
! ── NC13 Diminutive plural ──
  tu%+NC13%+PL:tu NounRootNC13 ;
  tw%+NC13%+PL:tw NounRootNC13 ;
! ── NC14 Abstract/mass ──
  bu%+NC14%+SG:bu NounRootNC14 ;
  bw%+NC14%+SG:bw NounRootNC14 ;
! ── NC15 Infinitives ──
  ku%+NC15:ku NounRootNC15 ;
  kw%+NC15:kw NounRootNC15 ;
! ── NC16 Locative definite ──
  a%+NC16:a NounRootNC16 ;
  aa%+NC16:aa NounRootNC16 ;
! ── NC17 Locative general ──
  ku%+NC17:ku NounRootNC17 ;
  kw%+NC17:kw NounRootNC17 ;
! ── NC18 Locative interior ──
  mu%+NC18:mu NounRootNC18 ;
  mw%+NC18:mw NounRootNC18 ;

! ── Noun root lexica ─────────────────────────────────────────
! These are populated from nouns.yaml by the build script.
! Each root routes to # (word boundary — nouns don't inflect further).

LEXICON NounRootNC1
! AUTO-GENERATED FROM nouns.yaml — stub examples
  ntu%+N:ntu # ;      ! person
  kaintu%+N:kaintu # ; ! woman
  lumi%+N:lumi # ;    ! man
  ana%+N:ana # ;      ! child (mwana after SND.1b: mu+ana→mwana)
! ... (from nouns.yaml where class_singular=NC1)

LEXICON NounRootNC2
! AUTO-GENERATED — NC2 entries (plurals of NC1)
  ntu%+N:ntu # ;      ! bantu
  kaintu%+N:kaintu # ;
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC1a
! Kinship terms with zero prefix
  mayo%+N:mayo # ;    ! mother (informal)
  tata%+N:tata # ;    ! father
  nyina%+N:nyina # ;  ! mother (respectful)
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC3
  ti%+N:ti # ;        ! tree/medicine (muti after mu+ti)
  nzi%+N:nzi # ;      ! wind
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC4
! mi- + root
  ti%+N:ti # ;        ! trees (miti)
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC5
! li- or zero + root
  nso%+N:nso # ;      ! eye (linso / inso dialectal)
  no%+N:no # ;        ! tooth (lino / ino dialectal)
  nda%+N:nda # ;      ! stomach
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC6
! ma- + root
  anzi%+N:anzi # ;    ! water (maanzi)
  no%+N:no # ;        ! teeth (meno)
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC7
! ci-/chi- + root
  ntu%+N:ntu # ;      ! thing (cintu)
  tonga%+N:tonga # ;  ! Tonga language (citonga)
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC8
! zi-/zy- + root
  ntu%+N:ntu # ;      ! things (zintu)
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC9
! nasal or zero + root
  ng%'ombe%+N:ng%'ombe # ;  ! cattle (apostrophe = prenasalised g)
  mbwa%+N:mbwa # ;    ! dog
  nkoko%+N:nkoko # ;  ! chicken
  ng%'anda%+N:ng%'anda # ;  ! house
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC10
! plural of NC9
  ng%'ombe%+N:ng%'ombe # ;
  mbwa%+N:mbwa # ;
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC11
  balo%+N:balo # ;    ! side (lubalo)
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC12
! ka- + root (diminutives)
  ntu%+N:ntu # ;      ! little thing (kantu)
  na%+N:na # ;        ! little child (kana)
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC13
! tu- + root (diminutive plural)
  ntu%+N:ntu # ;      ! little things (tuntu)
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC14
! bu-/bw- + root (abstract)
  ntu%+N:ntu # ;      ! humanity (buntu)
  suma%+N:suma # ;    ! goodness (busuma)
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC15
! ku-/kw- + verb root (infinitives)
! These entries are also derived from VerbRoot via infinitive path
  bon%+N:bon # ;      ! seeing (kubona)
  la%+N:la # ;        ! eating (kula)
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC16
! a- + root (locative definite — surface: e.g. aang'anda "at the house")
  ng%'anda%+N:ng%'anda # ;
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC17
! ku- + root (locative general)
  ng%'anda%+N:ng%'anda # ;
! ...

LEXICON NounRootNC18
! mu- + root (locative interior)
  ng%'anda%+N:ng%'anda # ;
  nzi%+N:nzi # ;      ! inside the wind (poetic / figurative)
! ...


! ==============================================================
! CLOSED CLASS (non-inflecting)
! Grammar: closed_class.yaml
! Conjunctions, prepositions, adverbs, interjections
! These have no continuation — they route directly to #.
! ==============================================================
